Tennessee, session 114, SB0445.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-14-204, is amended by deleting
"ten (10) days" and substituting "ten (10) business days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0445
001859
- 1 -